src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ASEHAS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  5 words with -is attr: asehis, asihis, oanehis, vuollegis, vuolligis
 :%>is ATTR ;
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +Use/-Spell:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +Sg+Nom:ažž K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:ažž%> R ;			! test this
 +Cmp/SgGen:ažž%> R ;
 :ažža%> ISSORASSA2- ;

LEXICON UNOHAS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for this word only
 +Use/NG:%>as ATTR ;
 :%>is ATTR ;
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +Use/-Spell:is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 :as JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +Sg+Nom:as K ;
 +Cmp/Attr+Use/-PLX:as%> R ;			! test this
 +Cmp/SgGen:as%> R ;
 :assa%> ISSORASSA2- ;

LEXICON IPMAHA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Tris. Gradating C-adj:s, The Troms declension: imaš:ipmaha, gáđaš:gáhtaha
 :š%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 +Use/-PLX:š%>X4 R ;
 +Sg+Nom:h%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:h%>X2a K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:h%>X2 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:h%>X2a R ; !compound also for these
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:h%>X2 R ; ! !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen:h%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:h%>X2a K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:h%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:h%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip:h%>X2at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:h%>X2ak K ;
 +Sg+Ill:h%>X2asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Nom:h%>X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 :h%>X2i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
 :h%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_MINIP ;



!! ## Trisyllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON MEAHTTUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  meahttun-adj. with comp. and superl. forms -seabbo, -seamos etc.
 :n%> ATTR ;
 :s%> EABBO/EAMOS_MINIP ;
 :m%> ADVC ; !Adverb form -meahttumit
 :m%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +Sg+Gen:m%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Gen:m%>a R ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Acc:m%>a K ;
 +Pl+Nom:m%>at K ;
 :m%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +Sg+Nom:m%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:m%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:m%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:m%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:m K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:m K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:m%>at VUOHTA ; !cealkemeahttumatvuohta, ikke i korpus

LEXICON BEAKKAN  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.
                   :%>      ATTR                 ;
          +Err/Orth:%>is    ATTR                 ;
                   :%>      EABBO/EAMOS          ;
                   :%>      GAPPUS0              ; ! NE and vuohta
            +Sg+Gen:%>a     K                    ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
            +Sg+Acc:%>a     K                    ;
            +Pl+Nom:%>at    K                    ;
                   :%>i     MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ; ! obl
            +Sg+Nom:%>      NPxC                 ;
            +Sg+Gen:%>      NPxC                 ;
            +Sg+Acc:%>      NPxC                 ;
            +Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch            ;
     +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:        K                    ; !
     +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:        K                    ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:%>at    VUOHTA               ;

LEXICON BEAKKAN_NOCOMP  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr. No comparatives
 :%> ATTR ;
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 :%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>iiddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:%>at VUOHTA ;

LEXICON GEARDAN  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.
 :%> ATTR ;
 +Err/Orth:%>is ATTR ;
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 :%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>iiddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:%>at VUOHTA ;

LEXICON JOHTIL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr.
 :%>is ATTR ;
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;    ! NE and vuohta
 :%> MALLASadj- ;    ! leads to MALLAS- and then to MALLASI-/NUORABU-
                  ! Has stem vowel -a- but also short genitive


LEXICON RAHKAT  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr. TO AVOID RAHKADIT
 :%>is ATTR ;
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ; replaced by individual pointers
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-GG:%>at SHORTCOMP_PRED_MINIP ; !
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Use/NG:%>it SHORTCOMP_MINIP ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-KJ:%>et SHORTCOMP_PRED_MINIP ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Use/NG:%>ut SHORTCOMP_MINIP ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:%>eabbu EABBU_ERRforms ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard.
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-KJ:%>eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-GG:%>abºbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:%>ebºbo EABBU_ERRforms ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:%>abºbu EABBU_ERRforms ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard.
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-GG:%>amos EAMOS ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:%>epmos EAMOS_ERRforms ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:%>eamºmos EAMOS ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-KJ:%>eapmo7s EAMOS ; !
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:%>eapmus EAMOS_ERRforms ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;    ! NE and vuohta
 :%> MALLASadj- ;    ! leads to MALLAS- and then to MALLASI-/NUORABU-
                  ! Has stem vowel -a- but also short genitive


LEXICON HEITTOHA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr.
 +Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>is K                   ;
         +Use/NG+Cmp/Attr:%>is Rreal               ;
                  +Use/-PLX:     VUOHTA              ; !
         +Cmp/Attr+Use/-PLX:     NAMAT               ;
                      +Attr:»    NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
    +Use/Circ+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#:#    ALIT                ;
                         :%>   EABBO/EAMOS_MINIP   ;
                         :%>   GAPPUS0             ; ! NE and vuohta
                         :%>   MALLASadj-_MINIP    ; ! leads to MALLAS- and then to MALLASI-/NUORABU-
                  ! Has stem vowel -a- but also short genitive

LEXICON GUOHCA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating V-Adj., no sep. Attr.
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
! :%>X4 BOAZU-NE ; replaced by indy pointers
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Use/-PLX+Cmp/Attr:%>X4X7 flagON-R ;
 +Use/-PLX+Cmp/Attr:%>X4 flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:%>X4»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:%>X4»X7viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n%> NPxC ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:in K ;


LEXICON GARAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final s Pred
 :%> ATTR ;
 :s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :s%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON LINIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final s Pred
 :a%> ATTR ;
 :ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :ás%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON SUVRRIS   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. weak grade a-Attr. and final s Pred
 :a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ás%>X2it K ;
 :ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 :ás%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
! +Err/Orth: HARVVIS ; !sub?


LEXICON NANUS   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. weak grade u-Attr. and final s Pred
 :%>X4 ATTR ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:s%>X2it K ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:s%>eppot K ;
 :s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 :s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 :s%>X2 MALLASadj- ;
