src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
asehaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:aseh ASEHAS "thin A" ;
asehaš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth-a-á:áseh ASEHAS "thin A" ;
asihaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:asi7h ASEHAS ;
biergováibmil+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:biergo#váibmil JOHTIL; !
boatkatmeahttun+A+Sem/Dummytag:boatkatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
bostta+A+Sem/Dummytag:bosºtag8 GUOHCA ;
báljesoaivvat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:báljes#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
ceaikkas+A+Sem/Dummytag:ceajºka GARAS ;
civzza+A+Sem/Dummytag:civºzag8 GUOHCA ;
deđot+A+Sem/Dummytag:de7đog BEAKKAN ;
diehtemeahttun+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:diehti7meahttu MEAHTTUS ;
valáštallanáŋgir+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:valáštallan#áŋgir JOHTIL; !
dimis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dipm LINIS ;
duhtatmeahttun+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duhtatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
eaŋkal+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eaŋkal JOHTIL; !
fuollameahttun+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:fuollameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
čáhppesgirjjat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čáhppes#girjjag BEAKKAN ;
ráddagalmmas+A+Sem/Dummytag:rádda#galbma GARAS ;
gaskageardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:gaska#geardán GEARDAN ;
goldnameahttun+A+Sem/Dummytag:goldnameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
gollil+A+Sem/Dummytag:gollil JOHTIL ;
golmmageardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:golmma#geardán GEARDAN ;
groavis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:groavv SUVRRIS ;
guonna+A+Sem/Dummytag:guonºnag8 GUOHCA ;
guovttedoaimmat+A+Sem/Dummytag:guovtte#doaimmag BEAKKAN ;
guovttegeardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:guovtte#geardán GEARDAN ;
gálvvas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gálºva GARAS ;
gáđaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:gáhºta IPMAHA ;
harbmat+A+Sem/Dummytag:harbmad BEAKKAN ;
heahpatmeahttun+A+Sem/Dummytag:heahpatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
heittot+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:heittoh HEITTOHA ;
huvlla+A+Sem/Dummytag:huvºlag8 GUOHCA ;
hávrra+A+Sem/Dummytag:hávºrag8 GUOHCA ;
iešoaivvat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ieš#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
imaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG+CmpNP/Last+Sem/Dummytag:ipma IPMAHA ;
jiešválddat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jieš#válddag BEAKKAN ;
joavdil+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:joavdil JOHTIL; !
jáhkkemeahttun+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:jáhkki7meahttu MEAHTTUS ;
jámmis+A+Sem/Dummytag:jámºm LINIS ;
kroavis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kroavv SUVRRIS ;
kuonna+A+Sem/Dummytag:kuonºnag8 GUOHCA ;
leappas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:leabba GARAS ;
linis+A+Sem/Dummytag:litn LINIS ;
logigeardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:logi#geardán GEARDAN ;
lusabeassameahttun+A+Sem/Dummytag:lusa#beassameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
meamma+A+Sem/Dummytag:meamºmag8 GUOHCA ;
meađmma+A+Sem/Dummytag:meađmmag8 GUOHCA ;
morreš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:morreš JOHTIL ;
máŋggadoaimmat+A+Sem/Dummytag:máŋgga#doaimmag BEAKKAN ;
máŋggageardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:máŋgga#geardán GEARDAN ;
nanus+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:nannu NANUS ;
njealjegeardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:njealje#geardán GEARDAN ;
njuohpa+A+Sem/Dummytag:njuohppag8 GUOHCA ;
beallenjuoskkas+A+Sem/Dummytag:bealle#njuosºka GARAS ;
nuppát+A+Sem/Dummytag:nuppád BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
oanehaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oaneh ASEHAS ;
oažžul+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oažžul JOHTIL ;
oktageardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:okta#geardán GEARDAN ;
olgeš+A+Sem/Dir:olgeš BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
ovttageardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:ovtta#geardán GEARDAN "simple A" ;
rahkat+A+Sem/Dummytag:rahkad RAHKAT ;
rievdameahttun+A+Sem/Dummytag:rievdameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
roavis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:roavv LINIS ;
roavis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:roavv SUVRRIS ; !Lene la den til, finnes slik i korp og på internet
muorjegirjjat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:muorje#girjjag BEAKKAN ;
ráttas+A+Sem/Dummytag:rádda GARAS ;
seavdda+A+Sem/Dummytag:seavºdag8 GUOHCA ;
skuortnjas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:skuordnja GARAS ;
skáddjil+A+Sem/Dummytag:skáddjil JOHTIL ;
skárppis+A+Sem/Dummytag:skárºp LINIS ;
smoahtis+A+Sem/Dummytag:smoahtt LINIS ;
spilddarođas+A+Sem/Dummytag:spilddar#ođđa GARAS ;
sreaŋggis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sreaŋºg LINIS ;
suvrris+A+Sem/Dummytag:suvºr SUVRRIS ;
unohas+A+Sem/Dummytag:unoh UNOHAS ;
veaddjil+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:veaddjil JOHTIL; !
villas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vilºla GARAS ;
viđageardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:viđa#geardán GEARDAN ;
viđaoaivvat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:viđa#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
vuoigatmeahttun+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuoigatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
vuollegaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuolleg ASEHAS ;
gudnevuollegaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gudne#vuolleg ASEHAS ;
vuolligaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuolli7g ASEHAS ;
vánis+A+Sem/Dummytag:vátn LINIS ;
ruhtavánis+A+Sem/Dummytag:ruhta#vátn LINIS ;
čaffat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čaffad JOHTIL ;
čatnasmeahttun+A+Sem/Dummytag:čatnasmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
čuođigeardán+A+Sem/Dummytag:čuođi#geardán GEARDAN ;
čáhppesalit+A+Sem/Dummytag:čáhppes#alih BEAKKAN ;
šliettas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:šliedda GARAS ;
